Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.204

Form of order in replevin.

FORM OF ORDER IN REPLEVIN

State of Washington,

County of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .,











ss.

To the sheriff or any constable of said county:

In the name of the state of Washington, you are hereby commanded to take the personal property mentioned and described in the within affidavit, and deliver the same to the plaintiff, upon receiving a proper undertaking, unless before such delivery, the defendant enter into a sufficient undertaking for the delivery thereof to the plaintiff, if delivery be adjudged.

Given under my hand this . . . . day of . . . . . . . ., (year) . . . .

J. P., Justice of the Peace.

[ 2016 c 202 s 15; 1957 c 89 s 6. Prior: Code 1881 s 1885, part; 1873 p 373 c 16, part; 1863 p 370 c 16, part; 1854 p 253 c 19, part; RRS s 1890, part.]